Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2906.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-1203, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1203. State board of dental examiners; members; qualifications; terms A. The state board of dental examiners is established consisting of six licensed dentists, one of whom is an oral and maxillofacial surgeon who is in active practice at the time of appointment, two licensed dental hygienists, two public members and one business entity member. all members shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four years, to begin and end on January 1. B. Before appointment by the governor, a prospective member of the board shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the governor for the purpose of obtaining a state and federal criminal records check pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. The department of public safety may exchange this fingerprint data with the federal bureau of investigation. C. The business entity member and the public members may participate in all board proceedings and determinations, except in preparing, giving or grading examinations for licensure. Dental hygienist board members may participate in all board proceedings and determinations, except in preparing, giving and grading examinations that do not relate to dental hygiene procedures. D. A board member shall not serve more than two consecutive terms. E. For the purposes of this section, the business entity member must be an employee or owner of a registered business entity pursuant to section 32-1213 and may not include a person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.